District of Columbia statutes.
7-2204

“Metropolitan Police Department”, “Fire Department” defined.

As used in § 7-2203, the terms “Metropolitan Police Department” and “Fire Department” shall include, respectively, offices or agencies succeeding to the functions of such departments pursuant to Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952.

History

July 6, 1953, 67 Stat. 140, ch. 179, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-1404.
1973 Ed., § 6-1202b.